Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-526
License and registration; conviction without a license; subsequent issuance of license or registration; proof of financial responsibility.

If a person is not licensed, but by final order or judgment is convicted of any offense requiring the suspension or revocation of license, or for operating a motor vehicle upon the highways without being licensed to do so, or for operating an unregistered motor vehicle upon the highways, no license shall be thereafter issued to such person and no motor vehicle shall continue to be registered or thereafter be registered in the name of such person until he shall give and thereafter maintain proof of financial responsibility.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 26, p. 493;

Laws 1959, c. 298, § 16, p. 1120.